Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Department of State Lands, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,060,000 for deposit into the Oregon Ocean  Science Fund es-
tablished under ORS 196.567, to be expended by the Oregon Ocean Science Trust, in consul-
tation with the Oregon Coordinating Council on Ocean  Acidification and Hypoxia, in the form
of competitive grants as follows:
(1) $100,000 for intertidal ocean acidification and hypoxia monitoring at Oregon  marine
reserves;
(2) $300,000 for subtidal ocean acidification and hypoxia monitoring at Oregon marine
reserves;
(3) $100,000 for ocean acidification and hypoxia monitoring at Yaquina Bay;
(4) $140,000 for ecosystem modeling of submerged aquatic vegetation;
(5) $25,000 to develop recommendations, through workshops or seminars, for maximizing
the abundance of wild shellfish, cultured shellfish and submerged aquatic vegetation  in
estuaries in Oregon;
(6) $150,000 to develop best management practices for conducting shellfish cultivation in
a manner that protects or promotes estuarine health;
(7) $180,000 to fund a study on the life cycle impacts of ocean acidification  and hypoxia
on shellfish species that are of importance to Oregon; and
(8) $65,000 to develop a communications plan and strategy  for outreach and education on
ocean acidification and hypoxia impacts, science and solutions.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,
out of the General Fund, the following amounts to be expended for the following purposes:
(1) $420,000 to be expended for the shellfish and estuarine assessment of coastal Oregon
project; and
(2) $50,000 to be expended to conduct estuary mapping for long-term documentation  of
ocean acidification and hypoxia impacts.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission, for distribution to Oregon State
University, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the following
amounts to be expended for the following purposes:
(1) $170,000 to be expended to  support the Molluscan Broodstock Program at the Hatfield
Marine Science Center in conjunction with the Whiskey Creek Shellfish Hatchery;
(2) $100,000 to be expended to support  the work of the Cooperative Institute for Marine
Resources Studies in augmentation of sampling along the  Newport Hydrographic Line in or-
der to support research on ocean acidification and hypoxia; and
(3) $100,000 to  be expended to support the work of the College of Earth, Ocean, and At-
mospheric Sciences in monitoring for ocean acidification using Burke-O-Lator systems.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled House Bill 3114 (HB 3114-A) Page 2
Passed by House June 22, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3114 (HB 3114-A) Page 3